Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 84

Arkansas HAZMAT Emergency Management Act

12-84-101. Title.

This chapter may be known and cited as the “Arkansas HAZMAT Emergency Management Act”.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 634, § 1.

12-84-102. Applicability.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as regulatory authority over acts, laws, rules, regulations, or guidelines of other state or federal agencies related to their designated responsibilities and duties as regulatory authorities over concerns of environmental, health, law enforcement, firefighting, medical, or other areas of responsibility.

The provisions of this chapter are intended to be supplemental to current provisions of Arkansas law, and shall not be construed as repealing or superseding any other laws applicable thereto.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 634, §§ 7, 8.

12-84-103. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Emergency management” means those activities related to disaster and emergency planning, mitigation, training, response, and recovery as prescribed in the Arkansas Emergency Services Act of 1973, § 12-75-101 et seq.;

“Hazardous and toxic materials” or “HAZMAT” means those extremely hazardous substances described under 42 U.S.C. § 11023, and such other hazardous or toxic substances as may later be designated by federal regulatory agencies;

“Local emergency planning committee” means those local entities authorized under the provisions of the Arkansas SERC/LEPC Act, § 12-82-101 et seq., and in accordance with the Emergency Planning and Community Right-to-Know Act of 1986, 42 U.S.C. § 11001 et seq.;

“State Hazardous Materials Emergency Response Commission” means that entity created under the provisions of the Arkansas SERC/LEPC Act, § 12-82-101 et seq., and in accordance with the Emergency Planning and Community Right-to-Know Act of 1986, 42 U.S.C. § 11001 et seq.; and

“Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986, Title III” refers to the Community Right-to-Know Act of 1986, 42 U.S.C. § 11001 et seq. and activities mandated therein.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 634, § 2.

12-84-104. State Office of Hazardous Materials Emergency Management.

There is created by this chapter a State Office of Hazardous Materials Emergency Management within and under the administrative and operational control of the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management.

The office shall perform the necessary actions and activities as required under current federal and state laws, rules, and regulations related to emergency planning, training, response, and recovery and, as specified in the Arkansas Emergency Services Act of 1973, § 12-75-101 et seq., relating to accidental, deliberate, or act-of-God releases of hazardous or toxic materials which might threaten the public health, safety, welfare, environment, or property of the citizens of Arkansas.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” for “State Office of Emergency Services” in this section.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 634, § 3; 1999, No. 646, § 54.

12-84-105. Powers and duties.

The State Office of Hazardous Materials Emergency Management shall:

Collect, file, and establish an accessible database and make available information derived from the required reports in 42 U.S.C. §§ 11022 and 11023, and in accordance with the laws, regulations, and guidelines established by the federal government and the State of Arkansas;

Establish, staff, and manage an administrative, fiscal, and operational office to manage all programs and funds required under this chapter and in accordance with the current, accepted practices prescribed by the State of Arkansas and participating federal agencies;

Establish and manage a system to train and certify emergency first responders at the minimum prescribed levels of competency and proficiency as required by federal or state law or regulation;

Assist, as requested or directed by the State Hazardous Materials Emergency Response Commission's local emergency planning committees in meeting the minimum standards for planning, training, or exercising as required under the provisions of the Emergency Planning and Community Right-to-Know Act of 1986, 42 U.S.C. § 11001 et seq.;

Establish a system to certify local emergency planning committees as being in compliance with required actions and activities, as prescribed by the Emergency Planning and Community Right-to-Know Act of 1986, 42 U.S.C. § 11001 et seq., and other governing directives, laws, or regulations;

Manage federal or state funding programs that provide direct fiscal assistance to certified local emergency planning committees for planning, training, exercising, or administration, to ensure program and fiscal compliance with current federal and state law;

Perform, manage, and oversee such other hazardous or toxic materials emergency management-related functions as may later be implemented, as directed by the Governor, the commission, and other state authority;

Collect and administer fees provided in this chapter and such federal funding as may be specifically earmarked for the program of the office, in accordance with current federal and state laws, regulations, and rules and as recommended by the commission to ensure minimum compliance with federal mandates related to hazardous or toxic materials emergency preparedness;

Provide a point of contact for state agencies, offices, and bureaus to assist with the coordination of specific emergency planning and training and other hazardous or toxic materials emergency management-related activities;

Provide direct emergency management support to local emergency planning committees to assist them with local hazardous or toxic materials emergency management activities and to assist them with reaching and maintaining compliance with federal mandates for these programs; and

Manage, as designated by the Governor or the commission, such other hazardous or toxic materials emergency management programs as may later be mandated by federal or state law, regulation, or guidance.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 634, § 4.

12-84-106. Fees.

Each facility required to report to the State Hazardous Materials Emergency Response Commission under the provisions of 42 U.S.C. §§ 11022 and 11023, shall pay the following annual fees to the State Office of Hazardous Materials Emergency Management:

For each facility required to file one (1) or more hazardous chemical inventory reports under 42 U.S.C. § 11022, an annual fee of fifty dollars ($50.00), and an additional fee of ten dollars ($10.00) for each report filed annually, with a maximum limit of one thousand dollars ($1,000) annually for each reporting facility; and

For each facility required to file one (1) or more toxic chemical release forms under the provisions of 42 U.S.C. § 11023, an annual fee of three hundred dollars ($300) and an additional fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each report, with a maximum limit of one thousand dollars ($1,000) annually for each reporting facility.

Any business or other outlet which sells gasoline, diesel, and other motor fuel only at retail to the public shall be exempt from paying the fees outlined in this subsection.

The commission shall periodically assess the adequacy of the fees established in this section, and may, through the public hearing process, modify the fees imposed for each individual report, not to exceed the stated maximum limit for each reporting facility as indicated in subsection (a) of this section.

Reports under the provisions of 42 U.S.C. §§ 11022 and 11023 shall be submitted to the office in accordance with, and within the specified time frames of the the Emergency Planning and Community Right-to-Know Act of 1986, 42 U.S.C. § 11001 et seq., and shall include a company check issued by the facility or its parent corporation for the appropriate amount of each submission, as specified in this section, and the check shall be made payable to the office.

Any facility or person failing to provide the reports and pay the fees, as specified in this section, shall be liable for civil penalties in such amount as the office shall find appropriate, not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation, and for payment of any expenses reasonably incurred by the state therefrom.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “under 42 U.S.C. § 11022, an annual fee of fifty dollars ($50.00), and an additional fee of ten dollars ($10.00) for each report filed annually, with a maximum limit ofone thousand dollars ($1,000)” for “under the provisions of 42 U.S.C. § 11022, an annual fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) and an additional fee of five dollars ($5.00) for each report filed annually, with a maximum limit of two hundred dollars ($200)” in (a)(1)(A); and substituted “three hundred dollars ($300) and an additional fee of fifty dollars ($50.00)” for “one hundred fifty dollars ($150) and an additional fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” in (a)(1)(B).

The 2015 amendment substituted “one thousand dollars ($1,000)” for “four hundred dollars ($400)” in (a)(1)(B).

Cross References. Office of Hazardous Materials Emergency Management Revolving Fund, §19-6-418.

Effective Dates. Acts 1997, No. 268, § 7: Feb. 25, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas: (1) that disasters can occur at any time, as demonstrated by recent tornadoes in Mount Pleasant, Mountain View, Van Buren, and Fort Smith; (2) that State employees who want to offer their services in a disaster must now do so at great personal sacrifice; (3) that because of the great personal cost involved many state employees are unable to participate in disaster relief; (4) that certain state employees already possess many of the skills needed during times of disaster; (5) that this act provides a mechanism for state employees to contribute to disaster relief without losing personal financial support; and (6) that this act will increase the State's ability to respond to disasters by providing instant access to specifically trained disaster workers who know the State's bureaucracy and resources. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 383, § 6: Mar. 2, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that due to the recent damage caused by tornadoes in this state the additional leave grant by this act will enable more personnel to participate in the disaster relief efforts. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date of the last house overrides the veto.”

History.

Acts 1995, No. 634, § 5; 2013, No. 996, § 1; 2015, No. 944, § 1.

12-84-107. Office of Hazardous Materials Emergency Management Revolving Fund.

There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue fund account to be known as the “Office of Hazardous Materials Emergency Management Revolving Fund”.

All moneys collected under this subchapter shall be deposited to the credit of that fund as special revenues and shall be used by the State Office of Hazardous Materials Emergency Management to operate the office and enforce this chapter.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 634, § 6.